Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.165

Application of chapter to claims filed under RCW 7.68.160.

The rights, privileges, responsibilities, duties, limitations and procedures contained in this chapter shall apply to those claims filed pursuant to RCW 7.68.160. In respect to such claims, the department shall proceed in the same manner and with the same authority as provided in this chapter with respect to those claims filed pursuant to RCW 7.68.060 as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 176 s 10.]